src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-nooqgw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - nǭʼgõ: # Noun 119 'eng /est nahk/fin' - full paradigm
     nǭʼgõ+N+Sg+Nom: [nǭʼgõ, nǭgõ]
     nǭʼgõ+N+Sg+Gen: [nǭʼgõ, nǭgõ]
     nǭʼgõ+N+Sg+Par: [nǭʼgõ, nǭgõ]
     nǭʼgõ+N+Sg+Dat: [nǭʼgõn, nǭgõn]
     nǭʼgõ+N+Sg+Ins: [nǭʼgõks, nǭgõks]
     nǭʼgõ+N+Sg+Ill: [nǭʼgõz, nǭʼgõ, nǭgõz, nǭgõ]
     nǭʼgõ+N+Sg+Ela: [nǭʼgõst, nǭgõst]
     nǭʼgõ+N+Pl+Nom: [nǭʼgõd, nǭgõd]
     nǭʼgõ+N+Pl+Gen: [nǭʼgõd, nǭgõd]
     nǭʼgõ+N+Pl+Par: [nǭʼgidi, nǭgidi]
     nǭʼgõ+N+Pl+Dat: [nǭʼgõdõn, nǭgõdõn]
     nǭʼgõ+N+Pl+Ins: [nǭʼgõdõks, nǭgõdõks]
     nǭʼgõ+N+Pl+Ill: [nǭʼgiž, nǭgiž]
     nǭʼgõ+N+Pl+Ela: [nǭʼgist,nǭgist]
